Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201473-602
Legislative findings and declaration.

(1) The Legislature
finds that:

(a) Transparency
in public procurement is an important tool to deter corruption and to maintain
the public's trust in government contracting;

(b) Taxpayers deserve
to know how and where their tax dollars are being spent;

(c) The economy
and general welfare of this state and its people and the economy and general
welfare of the United States are inseparably linked to the preservation and
development of manufacturing industries in this state, as well as all the
other states of this nation; and

(d) Recognizing such link, it should be
the policy of this state that, whenever possible, taxpayer dollars be reinvested
with its individual and employer taxpayers in order to foster job retention
and growth and to ensure a broad and healthy tax base for future investments
vital to the state's infrastructure.

(2) The Legislature declares that it shall
be the policy of this state that the Department of Administrative Services
shall quantify the portion of its procurement spending that is reinvested
with taxpayers in this state and the nation.

Laws 2014, LB371, § 2.